Washington statutes.
RCW 15.14.125

Late charge on fee or assessment.

A late charge of one and one-half percent per month shall be assessed on the unpaid balance against persons more than thirty days in arrears for any fee or assessment authorized by this chapter.

[ 1999 c 144 s 12.]